Illinois, session 104th, SB4139.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4ARTICLE 15    Section 5. The amount of $30,790,000, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education to meet its 8operational expenses for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 92026. 10    Section 10. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 11may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois State Board 12of Education for Evidence-Based Funding, provided for in 13Section 18-8.15 of the School Code:14Payable from the Education Assistance Fund........721,589,40015Payable from the Common School Fund.............3,213,015,60016Payable from the General Revenue Fund...........4,091,497,60017Payable from the Fund for the Advancement 18 of Education...................................1,215,136,40019  Total                                        $9,241,239,000 20    Section 15. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 21may be necessary, which shall be used by the Illinois State   SB4139- 2 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1Board of Education exclusively for the foregoing purposes and 2not, under any circumstances, for personal services 3expenditures or other operational or administrative costs, are 4appropriated to the Illinois State Board of Education for the 5fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026:6From the General Revenue Fund:7  For a grant to Learning Ally for services for8   Blind/Dyslexic Persons.............................846,0009  For Disabled Student Transportation10   Reimbursement..................................487,366,10011  For Disabled Student Tuition, Public and12   Private Tuition, including prior years' costs..222,732,40013  For District Consolidation Costs/14   Supplemental Payments to School Districts..........408,00015  For a grant to Illinois State University for Autism16   Training & Technical Assistance....................100,00017  For the Philip J. Rock Center18   and School.......................................5,000,00019  For Reimbursement for the Free Breakfast/20   Lunch Program....................................9,000,00021  For Tax-Equivalent Grants, Section 18-4.422   of the School Code.................................393,50023  For Transportation-Regular/Vocational24   Common School Transportation25   Reimbursement, Section 29-5 of the School Code...........026  For a grant to Chicago Lighthouse for Visually  SB4139- 3 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1   Impaired/Educational Materials Coordinating Unit,2   Section 14-11.01 of the School Code..............1,421,1003  For Regular Education Reimbursement4   Per Section 18-3 of the School Code,5   including prior years' costs....................15,668,3006  For Special Education Reimbursement7   Per Section 14-7.03 of the School Code,8   including prior years' costs...................132,733,2009  For all costs associated with Alternative10   Education/Regional Safe Schools.................20,000,00011  For Truants' Alternative and Optional12   Education Program...............................11,500,00013  For a grant to Teach for America for the Teach for14   America Program..................................2,000,00015  For Career and Technical Education...............59,300,00016  For its National Board Resource Center for17   all costs associated with administering18   the Illinois Teaching Excellence Program19   for National Board-Certified Teachers............2,500,00020From the Education Assistance Fund:21  For Transportation-Regular/Vocational Common School22   Transportation Reimbursement,23   Section 29-5 of the School Code................352,000,00024  For Disabled Student Tuition, Public and Private Tuition,25   including prior years' costs.............................026  For Disabled Student Transportation Reimbursement.........0  SB4139- 4 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1  Total                                        $1,322,968,600 2    Section 20. The amount of $7,850,000, or so much thereof 3as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 4Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for Agriculture 5Education Programs, and not, under any circumstances, for 6personal services expenditures or other operational or 7administrative costs, at the approximate costs below:8  For Agriculture Education Programs................6,005,0009  For Champaign Ford Regional Office10   of Education #9 for Facilitating Collaboration11   for Agricultural Education Local Program support,12   work-based learning, and curricular13   resource management..............................1,650,00014  For Growing Agriculture Science Teachers,15   at the approximate costs below:16    Southern Illinois University.......................30,00017    University of Illinois.............................30,00018    Illinois State University..........................30,00019    Western Illinois University........................30,000 20    Highland Community College District 519............12,50021    Lake Land Community College District 517...........12,50022    Sauk Valley Community College District 506.........12,50023    Black Hawk Community College District 503..........12,50024    Illinois Central Community College25     District 514......................................12,500  SB4139- 5 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1    Joliet Community College District 525..............12,500 2    Section 25. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois State Board 4of Education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026:5From the General Revenue Fund:6  For State and District Technology Support.........2,443,8007  For Advanced Placement Classes......................500,0008  For Principal Recruitment Program.................1,800,0009  For Low-Income Advanced Placement Fee.............2,500,00010  For After School Matters..........................6,000,00011  For After-School Programming.....................25,000,00012  For the Southwest Organizing Project Parent13   Mentoring Program...............................14,000,00014  For Grant Accountability and Transparency Act and15   Budgeting for Results Initiatives..................480,00016    Total                                         $52,723,800 17    Section 30. The amount of $40,000,000, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 19Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for stateside 20student assessments, including the English Language 21Proficiency assessment and the Kindergarten Individual 22Development Survey (KIDS), and for reporting, accountability 23activities, and related support; and for statewide academic 24recognition programs, including the Illinois Blue Ribbon   SB4139- 6 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1Schools Program. 2    Section 35. The amount of $615,100, or so much thereof as 3may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 4Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for all costs 5associated with Educator Misconduct Hearings and 6Investigations. 7    Section 40. The amount of $500,000, or so much thereof as 8may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 9Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for all costs 10authorized by the Educator Licensure Article of the School 11Code, including refunds. 12    Section 45. The amount of $1,500,000, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 14Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for all costs 15associated with the Computer Science Equity Program. 16    Section 50. The amount of $2,347,000, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 18Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for deposit into 19The Imagination Library of Illinois Fund for grants associated 20with the Imagination Library of Illinois Grant Program. 21    Section 55. The amount of $15,000,000, or so much thereof   SB4139- 7 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 2Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for grants, 3contracts, and administrative expenses for costs associated 4with the Teacher Vacancy Pilot Program. 5    Section 60. The amount of $1,500,000, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 7Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for grants, 8contracts, and administrative expenses associated with 9implementation of the Illinois Comprehensive Literacy Plan and 10the Illinois Comphrensive Numeracy Plan. 11    Section 65. The amount of $200,000, or so much thereof as 12may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 13Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for all costs 14related to development of an alternative low-income population 15count for Evidence-Based Funding calculations in response to 16Public Law 119-21. 17    Section 70. The amount of $3,500,000, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General Revenue 19Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education for all costs 20associated with the Social-Emotional Learning Hubs and the 21Resilience Education to Advance Community Healing program, 22including continued development and expansion of 23Resilience-Supportive Schools Illinois, at the approximate   SB4139- 8 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1costs below:2  For a grant to the Ann and Robert H. Lurie Children's 3   Hospital of Chicago Center for Childhood Resilience 4   for the Resilience Education to Advance Community 5   Healing program, including continued development6   and expansion of Resilience-Supportive 7   Schools Illinois.................................1,000,0008  For Regional Office of Education #1.................357,1429  For Regional Office of Education #4.................357,14310  For Regional Office of Education #19................357,14311  For Regional Office of Education #21................357,14312  For Regional Office of Education #39................357,14313  For Regional Office of Education #40................357,14314  For City of Chicago School District 299.............357,143 15ARTICLE 216    Section 5. The amount of $7,500,000, or so much thereof as 17may be necessary, is appropriated from the Teacher Certificate 18Fee Revolving Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education 19for all costs authorized by the Educator Licensure Article of 20the School Code, including refunds. 21    Section 10. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 22amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State 23Board of Education Special Purpose Trust Fund to the Illinois   SB4139- 9 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1State Board of Education for expenditures by the Board in 2accordance with grants, gifts, royalty payments, or donations 3that the Board has received or may receive from any source, 4public or private, in support of projects that are within the 5lawful powers of the Board, including refunds. 6    Section 15. The amount of $10,000,000, or so much of that 7amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State 8Board of Education Special Purpose Trust Fund to the Illinois 9State Board of Education for its ordinary and contingent 10expenses. 11    Section 20. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 12as may be necessary, is appropriated from the School District 13Emergency Financial Assistance Fund for use by the Illinois 14State Board of Education as provided in Section 1B-8 of the 15School Code. 16    Section 25. The amount of $2,208,900, or so much thereof 17as may be necessary, is appropriated from the ISBE Teacher 18Certificate Institute Fund to the Illinois State Board of 19Education for costs authorized by the School Code, including 20refunds. 21    Section 30. The amount of $200,000, or so much of that 22amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the   SB4139- 10 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1After-School Rescue Fund to the Illinois State Board of 2Education for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 3    Section 35. The amount of $600,000, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, is appropriated from the School 5Infrastructure Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education 6for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 7    Section 40. The amount of $1,000,000, or so much thereof 8as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Temporary 9Relocation Expenses Revolving Grant Fund for use by the 10Illinois State Board of Education as provided in Section 112-3.77 of the School Code. 12    Section 45. The amount of $1,050,000, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Board of 14Education Special Purpose Trust Fund to the Illinois State 15Board of Education for all costs associated with its Charter 16School Department, per 105 ILCS 5/27A-7.5. 17    Section 50. The amount of $14,000,000, or so much thereof 18as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Personal 19Property Tax Replacement Fund to the Illinois State Board of 20Education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026, for 21Regional Superintendents' and Assistants' Compensation and 22Related Benefits.   SB4139- 11 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1    Section 55. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 2may be necessary, are appropriated from the Personal Property 3Tax Replacement Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education 4for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026:5  For Bus Driver Training.............................150,0006  For Regional Superintendents' Services...........18,970,0007    Total                                         $19,120,000 8    Section 60. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 9may be necessary, which shall be used by the Illinois State 10Board of Education exclusively for the foregoing purposes and 11not, under any circumstances, for personal services 12expenditures or other operational or administrative costs, are 13appropriated to the Illinois State Board of Education for the 14fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026:15From the Drivers Education Fund:16  For Driver Education.............................14,000,00017From the Charter Schools Revolving Loan Fund:18  For Charter Schools Loans...........................200,00019From the School Technology Revolving Loan Fund:20  For School Technology Loans, Section 2-3.117a21   of the School Code...............................7,500,00022    Total                                         $21,700,000 23    Section 65. The amount of $1,850,000, or so much thereof   SB4139- 12 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1as may be necessary, is appropriated from the State Board of 2Education Special Purpose Trust Fund to the Illinois State 3Board of Education for Grant Accountability and Transparency 4Act and Budgeting for Results Initiatives. 5    Section 70. The amount of $3,347,000, or so much thereof 6as may be necessary, is appropriated from the Imagination 7Library of Illinois Fund to the Illinois State Board of 8Education for a grant to the Dolly Parton's Imagination 9Library of Illinois Foundation for all costs associated with 10the Imagination Library of Illinois Grant Program. 11ARTICLE 312    Section 5. The amount of $19,904,700, or so much of that 13amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 14Federal Department of Agriculture Fund to the Illinois State 15Board of Education for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 16    Section 10. The amount of $2,900,000, or so much of that 17amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 18Federal Agency Services Fund to the Illinois State Board of 19Education for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 20    Section 15. The amount of $50,869,800, or so much of that 21amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE   SB4139- 13 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1Federal Department of Education Fund to the Illinois State 2Board of Education for its ordinary and contingent expenses. 3    Section 20. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 4may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois State Board 5of Education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026:6From the SBE Federal Department of Agriculture Fund:7  For Child Nutrition...........................1,250,000,0008From the SBE Federal Department of Education Fund:9  For Title I...................................1,350,000,00010  For Title III....................................56,000,00011  For Title V.......................................3,000,00012  For Title X......................................10,000,00013  For Individuals with Disabilities Education Act,14   Deaf/Blind for a grant to Philip J. Rock Center15   and School for Project Reach.......................800,00016  For Individuals with Disabilities Education Act,17   Improvement Program..............................5,000,00018  For Individuals with Disabilities Education Act,19   Preschool.......................................41,000,00020  For Grants for Vocational21   Education - Basic...............................80,000,00022  For Student Assessments..........................35,000,00023  For Institute of Education Sciences Grant.........3,500,00024    Total                                      $2,834,300,000   SB4139- 14 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1    Section 25. The amount of $300,000,000 or so much of that 2amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 3Federal Department of Education Fund to the Illinois State 4Board of Education for Title IV at the approximate costs 5below:6  For Title IV....................................299,698,0007  For Metropolitan Family Services (ACT Now) .........302,000 8    Section 30. The amount of $8,400,000, or so much of that 9amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 10Federal Department of Education Fund to the Illinois State 11Board of Education for the Mental Health Service Professional 12Demonstration Grant, at the approximate costs below:13  For Mental Health Professional Demonstration 14   services.........................................5,190,28615  For Mental Health Professional Demonstration services16   and supports at the approximate costs below:17  Southern Illinois University (SIU)18  in Carbondale...................................1,068,00019  Stress and Trauma Treatment Center................144,00020  National Louis University.........................150,00021  Western Illinois University.......................670,94422  University of Illinois at Champaign-Urbana......1,176,770 23    Section 35. The amount of $13,000,000, or so much of that 24amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE   SB4139- 15 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1Federal Department of Education Fund to the Illinois State 2Board of Education for School-Based Mental Health Services, at 3the approximate costs below:4  For School-Based Mental Health services...........7,854,7535  For School-Based Mental Health services and supports6   at the approximate costs below:7  ROE 40..........................................2,450,0008  Stress and Trauma Treatment Center................294,0009  For School-Based Mental Health program coordination,10   services and supports at the approximate costs below:11  Stress and Trauma Center........................2,401,247 12    Section 40. The amount of $160,000,000, or so much thereof 13as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE Federal 14Department of Education Fund to the Illinois State Board of 15Education for Title II, at the approximate costs below:16  For Title II....................................157,850,00017  For a grant to or contract with the18   Illinois Principals Association in support of19   the Ed Leaders Network platform..................1,500,00020  For a grant to or contract with the Illinois21   Association of School Administrators for providing22   scholarships, support, and mentoring services to23   superintendents and aspiring superintendents.......650,000 24    Section 45. The amount of $980,000,000, or so much thereof   SB4139- 16 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE Federal 2Department of Education Fund to the Illinois State Board of 3Education for Individuals with Disabilities Education Act, 4IDEA, at the approximate costs below:5  For Individuals with Disabilities6   Education Act, IDEA............................975,769,5777  For a grant to Illinois State University8   for the Autism Learning and Supports Project.....1,239,8999  For a grant to the Illinois Deaf and Hard of10   Hearing Commission for the Illinois Deaf and11   Hard of Hearing Program.............................80,00012  For a grant to United Cerebral Palsy - Seguin13   for the Assistive Technology Exchange Network......450,00014  For a grant to United Cerebral Palsy -15   Seguin for Assistive Technology Training16   and Technical Assistance...........................300,00017  For a grant to Illinois Assistive Technology18   Program for the Assistive Technology Device and19   Loan Program.....................................1,510,52420  For a grant to Northwest Special Education21   Organization for the Illinois Service22   Resource Center....................................650,000 23    Section 50. The following amounts, or so much thereof as 24may be necessary, are appropriated to the Illinois State Board 25of Education for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2026:   SB4139- 17 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1 From SBE Federal Agency Services Fund:2  For Adolescent Health Programs......................475,000 3    Section 55. The amount of $2,000,000, or so much thereof 4as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE Federal 5Agency Services Fund to the Illinois State Board of Education 6for STOP School Violence and Mental Health Programs, at the 7approximate costs below:8  For STOP School Violence and 9   Mental Health Programs...........................1,164,13110  For STOP School Violence and Mental 11   Health programs,at the approximate costs below:12  University of Illinois Chicago....................151,31513  Midwest PBIS Network..............................684,554 14    Section 60. The amount of $6,500,000, or so much of that 15amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 16Federal Agency Services Fund to the Illinois State Board of 17Education for Substance Abuse and Mental Health Services, at 18the approximate costs below:19  For Substance Abuse and Mental20   Health Services..................................4,086,73321  For Mental health services and supports,22   at the approximate costs below:23  Regional Office of Education 40...................533,00024  Intermediate Service Center #2..................1,200,989  SB4139- 18 -OMB104 00269 JCS 10269 b1  Illinois Department of Human Services..............29,2782  For School-Based Trauma-Informed Support Services3   (TISS), at the approximate costs below:4  Center for Childhood Resilience...................200,0005  Proviso Leyden Council for Community6   Action, Inc. (PLCCA).............................100,0007  Stress & Trauma Treatment Center (SATTC)..........250,0008  West Cook ISC #2..................................100,000 9    Section 65. The amount of $20,000,000, or so much of that 10amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the SBE 11Federal Agency Services Fund to the Illinois State Board of 12Education for grants, contracts, and administrative expenses 13of the Clean Heavy-Duty Vehicles grant program. 14    Section 999. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 152026.